Utah statutes.
59-2-1349.   Co-owners -- Procedures for redemption.
If two or more persons own an undivided interest in property on which a
delinquency exists, any owner may redeem the owner's interest in the property
upon payment of that portion of the taxes, interest, penalties, and
administrative costs which the owner's interest bears to the whole, as
determined by the county legislative body.
